Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-108
Bonds; state officers; sureties; number; qualification; affidavits required.

Each official bond of a state officer shall be executed by the officer as principal and by at least three residents of the state as sureties who shall be worth in the aggregate the amount of the bond over and above all their present indebtedness; and affidavits of the sureties, showing the value of the property owned by each and subject to levy and sale under execution in this state, shall be made and presented to the officer approving such bond, and shall be filed therewith; or the bond of any state officer may be executed by the officer as principal and by a guaranty, surety, fidelity or bonding company as surety, or by two or more of such companies as sureties. Only such companies as are legally authorized to transact business in this state shall be eligible to suretyship on the bond of a state officer.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 8, p. 96;

Laws 1905, c. 10, § 1, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 5714;

C.S.1922, § 5044;

C.S.1929, § 12-108;

R.S.1943, § 11-108.

Elected county officials are required to give individual official bonds. Blanket bond is not sufficient. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).

When an officer writes his name in the body of paper prepared by himself as an official bond, and subscribes his oath of office endorsed thereon, which instrument is delivered, accepted and approved as his official bond, it is valid even though the signature of the officer is omitted at the bottom of the bond. State v. Hill, 47 Neb. 456, 66 N.W. 541 (1896).